Washington statutes.
RCW 26.34.030

"Appropriate public authorities" defined.

The "appropriate public authorities" as used in Article III of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children shall, with reference to this state, mean the department of children, youth, and families, and said agency shall receive and act with reference to notices required by said Article III.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 330; 1971 ex.s. c 168 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.